District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.15

Merit personnel system inapplicable.

(a)

Except as provided in this section and in § 34-2202.17(b), no provision of § 1-601.01 et seq., shall apply to employees of the Authority except as follows:

(1)

Subchapters V and XVII of Chapter 6 of Title 1 shall apply to all employees of the Authority; and

(2)

Subchapters XII, XXI, XXII, and XXVI of Chapter 6 of Title 1 shall apply to employees transferred to the Authority who are covered under the Civil Service Retirement System and the District of Columbia Defined Contribution Pension Plan; provided, that all Authority employees continuously employed by the District government since December 31, 1979, shall be guaranteed rights and benefits at least equal to those currently applicable to such persons under provisions of law and rules and regulations in force prior to April 18, 1996.

(b)

An employee of the Authority who is covered under the District of Columbia Defined Contribution Pension Plan, who meets the minimum requirements for participation in a retirement plan established by the Authority, may, upon written notice to the Authority, elect, instead, to be covered by the Authority’s plan.

(c)

Repealed.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 215, 43 DCR 548
Feb. 6, 2008, D.C. Law 17-108, § 213(b), 54 DCR 10993
July 15, 2008, 122 Stat. 2491, Pub. L. 110-273, § 4(a)
This section is referenced in § 34-2202.02.
1981 Ed., § 43-1685.
D.C. Law 17-108 added subsec. (c).
Pub. L. 110-273 repealed subsec. (c), as added by D.C. Law 17-108.
Section 4(b) of Pub. L. 110-273 provided that subsection (a) shall take effect as if included in the enactment of D.C. Law 17-172.